Utah statutes.
53A-6-106.    Qualifications of applicants for licenses -- Changes in
qualifications.
(1)  The board shall establish by rule the scholarship, training, and
experience required of license applicants.
(2) (a)  The board shall announce any increase in the requirements when made.
(b)  An increase in requirements shall become effective not less than one year
from the date of the announcement.
(3)  The board may determine by examination or otherwise the qualifications of
license applicants.
